Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 11 Superior Court Practice

9-11-1 — 9-11-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 277 to 281, 283; G.L. 1909, ch. 287, §§ 1-5, 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 337, §§ 1-5, 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 526, §§ 1-5, 7; G.L. 1956, §§

9-11-1

— 9-11-6; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 23, effective January 10, 1966. A substantial part of the procedure of a civil nature in the superior court is now governed by the Rules of Civil Procedure and Practice for the Superior Court contained in Volume 2B.

9-11-7.
Trials without jury.

In every action at law originally brought in the superior court or removed to the superior court on appeal from a district court, if neither party claims a jury trial in accordance with applicable procedural rules, then jury trial as of right shall be deemed to be waived in the case and trial shall be had in such form as the court shall determine in accordance with applicable procedural rules.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 282; G.L. 1909, ch. 287, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 337, § 6; P.L. 1929, ch. 1327, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 526, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-11-7

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 22.

9-11-8.
County in which questions heard and disposed of — Intervention of jury.

All questions of pleading or practice, not arising in the trial of the case, all motions, and all defaulted cases in the superior court shall be heard and disposed of by the court for the county in which the action is pending; provided, that all such matters arising in Newport, Kent, or Washington county may, when the court is not sitting in the county, be heard and disposed of in Providence, and, if, after judgment is rendered on motion or default, damages are to be assessed, they shall be assessed by the court with the intervention of a jury unless cause be shown why there should be no intervention of a jury.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 284; G.L. 1909, ch. 287, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 337, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 526, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-11-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 22.